Nevada, session 83, AB199.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 202.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.280 1. [Unless a greater penalty is provided in NRS
202.287, a] A person, whether under the influence of liquor, a
controlled substance or otherwise, who [maliciously, wantonly or]
negligently discharges or causes to be discharged any pistol, gun or
any other kind of firearm, in or upon any public street or
thoroughfare, or in any theater, hall, store, hotel, saloon or any other
place of public resort, or throws any deadly missile in a public place
or in any place where any person might be endangered thereby,
although no injury results, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
2. All civil, military and peace officers shall be vigilant in
carrying the provisions of subsection 1 into full force and effect.
Any peace officer who neglects his or her duty in the arrest of any
such offender is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. NRS 202.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.290 Unless a greater penalty is provided in NRS 202.287,
a person who willfully:
1. Aims any gun, pistol, revolver or other firearm, whether
loaded or not, at or toward any human being [; or] is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.
-
*AB199*

– 3 –
2. Discharges any [firearm,] air gun or [other] weapon [,] other
than a firearm, or throws any deadly missile in a public place or in
any place where any person might be endangered thereby, although
an injury does not result,
[] is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
3. Discharges any firearm in a public place within an area
designated by city or county ordinance as a populated area for the
purpose of prohibiting the discharge of weapons or in any place
where any person might be endangered thereby, although an
injury does not result, is guilty of:
(a) For a first offense, a category C felony and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(b) For a second or subsequent offense, or if the person
discharges any firearm more than once in a single occurrence or
has previously been convicted of any offense involving the
discharge of a firearm, a category B felony and shall be punished
by imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not
less than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years.
Sec. 3. NRS 62E.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.650 [1.] If a child is adjudicated delinquent because the
child handled or possessed a firearm or had a firearm under his or
her control in violation of NRS 202.300, the juvenile court : [shall:]
[(a)] 1. For the first offense [:] , shall:
[(1)] (a) Order the child to perform at least 200 hours but
not more than 600 hours of community service; and
[(2)] (b) Issue an order suspending the driver’s license of the
child for [not more than 1 year] at least 90 days but not more than
2 years or, if the child does not possess a driver’s license, prohibit
the child from receiving a driver’s license for at least 90 days but
not more than [1 year:] 2 years:
[(I)] (1) Immediately following the date of the order, if
the child is eligible to receive a driver’s license.
[(II)] (2) After the date the child becomes eligible to
receive a driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a
license on the date of the order.
[(b)] 2. For the second offense [:
(1) Order the child to perform at least 200 hours but not more
than 600 hours of community service; and
(2) Issue an order suspending the driver’s license of the child
for at least 90 days but not more than 2 years or, if the child does not
possess a driver’s license, prohibit the child from receiving a
driver’s license for at least 90 days but not more than 2 years:
(I) Immediately following the date of the order, if the
child is eligible to receive a driver’s license.
-
*AB199*

– 4 –
(II) After the date the child becomes eligible to receive a
driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a license on the
date of the order.
2. If the child is already the subject of a court order suspending
or delaying the issuance of the driver’s license of the child, the
juvenile court shall order an additional suspension or delay, as
appropriate, to apply consecutively with the previous order.] , may:
(a) Commit the child for confinement in a secure facility for
the detention of children, including a facility which is secured by
its staff; and
(b) Impose any other punitive measures that the juvenile court
determines to be in the best interest of the public or the child.
H
-
*AB199*